Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 32 Liens on Motor Vehicles

34-32-1.
Liens on motor vehicles.

No person shall attach or cause a lien to be levied upon any motor vehicle for money due for repairs to the motor vehicle in an amount exceeding an authorization signed by the owner indicating the cost of the repairs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 286, § 1.